New York, session 2025-2026, A282.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 915-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 915-a. Universal school meals. 1. The department shall require all 4 public school districts, charter schools and non-public schools in the 5 state that participate in the national school lunch program or school 6 breakfast program as provided in the Richard B. Russell National School 7 Lunch Act and the Child Nutrition Act, as amended, to serve breakfast 8 and lunch at no cost to the student. Public school districts, charter 9 schools and non-public schools shall maximize federal reimbursement for 10 school breakfast and lunch programs by adopting Provision 2, the federal 11 Community Eligibility Provision, or any other provision under such act, 12 the National School Lunch Act or the National Child Nutrition Act. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00977-01-5 A. 282 2 1 2. The department shall reimburse the difference between the amount 2 paid by the United States Department of Agriculture and the free rate as 3 set annually by the United States Secretary of Agriculture under 42 4 U.S.C. 1759a for each school. 5 3. The department in consultation with the office of temporary and 6 disability assistance shall promulgate any rule or regulation needed for 7 public school districts, charter schools and non-public schools to 8 promote the supplemental nutrition assistance program to a student or 9 person in parental relation to a student by either providing application 10 assistance or a direct referral to an outreach partner identified by the 11 department to the office of temporary and disability assistance to 12 increase the number of students directly certified for free or reduced 13 price school meals. 14 4. In addition to fulfilling any other applicable state and federal 15 requirements, the department shall provide technical assistance to 16 assist public school districts, charter schools, and non-public schools 17 in the transition to universal school meals to ensure successful program 18 operations and to maximize federal funding, including: 19 a. Assisting local educational agencies with one or more community-el- 20 igibility qualifying schools in meeting any state and federal require- 21 ments necessary in order to receive reimbursement through the community 22 eligibility provision. 23 b. If a school or district is ineligible to receive reimbursement 24 through the community eligibility provision, assisting the school or 25 district in achieving eligibility and, if that is not feasible, assist 26 the school or district in determining the viability of using Provision 2 27 or other special federal provisions available to schools. 28 c. Maximizing direct certification for specific populations as allow- 29 able under federal rules. 30 § 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025.